Illinois, session 104th, HB3074.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act is amended 5by adding Article 43 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 705/Art. 43 heading new)7ARTICLE 43. 8License and Regulation of 9Cannabis Delivery Organizations. 10    (410 ILCS 705/43-1 new)11    Sec. 43-1. Definition. In this Article, "Department" means 12the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation. 13    (410 ILCS 705/43-5 new)14    Sec. 43-5. Issuance of licenses.15    (a) The Department shall issue cannabis delivery 16organization licenses through a process provided for in this 17Article and by rule.18    (b) The Department shall make the application for cannabis 19delivery organization licenses at a time set by rule.  20    (410 ILCS 705/43-10 new)  HB3074- 2 -LRB104 05667 BDA 15697 b1    Sec. 43-10. Application.2    (a) When applying for a cannabis delivery organization 3license, the applicant shall submit the following in such form 4as the Department may direct:5        (1) a nonrefundable application fee of $500 or, after 6    January 1, 2026, another amount as set by rule by the 7    Department, to be deposited into the Cannabis Regulation 8    Fund;9        (2) the legal name of the cannabis delivery 10    organization;11        (3) the proposed physical address of the cannabis 12    delivery organization, if one is proposed;13        (4) the name, address, social security number, and 14    date of birth of each principal officer and board member 15    of the cannabis delivery organization;16        (5) the details of any administrative or judicial 17    proceeding in which any of the principal officers or board 18    members of the cannabis delivery organization (i) pled 19    guilty, were convicted, fined, or had a registration or 20    license suspended or revoked or (ii) managed or served on 21    the board of a business or nonprofit organization that 22    pled guilty, was convicted, fined, or had a registration 23    or license suspended or revoked;24        (6) verification from the Illinois State Police that 25    all background checks of the prospective principal 26    officers, board members, and agents of the cannabis   HB3074- 3 -LRB104 05667 BDA 15697 b1    delivery organization have been conducted;2        (7) a copy of the current local zoning ordinance or 3    permit and verification that the proposed cannabis 4    delivery organization is in compliance with the local 5    zoning rules and distance limitations established by the 6    local jurisdiction, if the cannabis delivery organization 7    has a business address;8        (8) proposed employment practices, in which the 9    applicant must demonstrate a plan of action to inform, 10    hire, and educate minorities, women, veterans, and persons 11    with disabilities, engage in fair labor practices, and 12    provide worker protections;13        (9) whether an applicant can demonstrate experience in 14    or business practices that promote economic empowerment in 15    Disproportionately Impacted Areas;16        (10) the identity of every person having a financial 17    or voting interest of 5% or more in the cannabis delivery 18    organization with respect to which the license is sought, 19    whether a trust, corporation, partnership, limited 20    liability company, or sole proprietorship, including the 21    name and address of each person; and22        (11) any other information required by rule.23    (b) Applicants must submit all required information, 24including the information required in Section 43-35, to the 25Department. Failure by an applicant to submit all required 26information may result in the application being disqualified.  HB3074- 4 -LRB104 05667 BDA 15697 b1    (c) Each principal officer and board member of an 2applicant shall be at least 21 years of age. 3    (d) If the Department receives an application with missing 4information, the Department may issue a deficiency notice to 5the applicant. The applicant shall have 10 calendar days from 6the date of the deficiency notice to resubmit the incomplete 7information. Applications that are still incomplete after this 8opportunity to cure will not be scored and will be 9disqualified.  10    (410 ILCS 705/43-15 new)11    Sec. 43-15. Issuing licenses.12    (a) The Department shall, by rule, develop a system to 13score cannabis delivery applications to administratively rank 14applications based on the clarity, organization, and quality 15of the applicant's responses to required information. 16Applicants shall be awarded points based on the following 17categories: 18        (1) suitability of employee training plan;19        (2) security and recordkeeping plan;20        (3) business plan;21        (4) labor and employment practices, which shall 22    constitute no less than 2% of total available points;23        (5) environmental plan that demonstrates an 24    environmental plan of action to minimize the carbon 25    footprint, environmental impact, and resource needs for   HB3074- 5 -LRB104 05667 BDA 15697 b1    the cannabis delivery organization;2        (6) the applicant is 51% or more owned and controlled 3    by an individual or individuals who have been an Illinois 4    resident for the past 5 years as proved by tax records or 2 5    of the following:6            (A) a signed lease agreement that includes the 7        applicant's name;8            (B) a property deed that includes the applicant's 9        name;10            (C) school records;11            (D) a voter registration card;12            (E) an Illinois driver's license, an Illinois 13        Identification Card, or an Illinois Person with a 14        Disability Identification Card;15            (F) a paycheck stub;16            (G) a utility bill; or17            (H) any other proof of residency or other 18        information necessary to establish residence as 19        provided by rule;20        (7) a diversity plan that includes a narrative of not 21    more than 2,500 words that establishes a goal of diversity 22    in ownership, management, employment, and contracting to 23    ensure that diverse participants and groups are afforded 24    equality of opportunity; and25        (8) any other criteria the Department may, by rule, 26    set for points.  HB3074- 6 -LRB104 05667 BDA 15697 b1    (b) Applicants must qualify as a social equity applicant 2in order to be awarded a cannabis delivery organization 3license.4    (c) Should an applicant be awarded a cannabis delivery 5organization license, the information and plans that the 6applicant provided in its application, including any plans 7submitted for the acquiring of bonus points, shall be a 8mandatory condition of the permit. Any variation from or 9failure to perform such plans may result in discipline, 10including the revocation or nonrenewal of a license.11    (d) If an applicant is awarded a cannabis delivery 12organization license, the applicant shall pay a prorated fee 13of $500 prior to receiving the license, to be deposited into 14the Cannabis Regulation Fund. The Department may, by rule, 15adjust the fee in this Section after January 1, 2026.  16    (410 ILCS 705/43-20 new)17    Sec. 43-20. Denial of application. An application for a 18cannabis delivery organization license shall be denied if any 19of the following conditions are met: 20        (1) the applicant failed to submit the materials 21    required by this Article;22        (2) the applicant would not be in compliance with 23    local zoning rules or permit requirements;24        (3) one or more of the prospective principal officers 25    or board members causes a violation of Section 43-25;  HB3074- 7 -LRB104 05667 BDA 15697 b1        (4) one or more of the principal officers or board 2    members is under 21 years of age;3        (5) the person has submitted an application for a 4    license under this Article that contains false 5    information; or6        (6) the licensee, principal officer, board member, or 7    person having a financial or voting interest of 5% or 8    greater in the licensee is delinquent in filing any 9    required tax returns or paying any amounts owed to the 10    State of Illinois.  11    (410 ILCS 705/43-25 new)12    Sec. 43-25. Cannabis delivery organization requirements; 13prohibitions.14    (a) The operating documents of a cannabis delivery 15organization shall include procedures for the oversight of the 16organization, an inventory monitoring system including a 17physical inventory recorded weekly, accurate recordkeeping, 18and a staffing plan.19    (b) All cannabis delivered by a cannabis delivery 20organization must be entered into a data collection system and 21placed into a cannabis container for transport.22    (c) Cannabis delivery organizations are subject to random 23inspections by the Department, the Department of Public 24Health, and the Illinois State Police.25    (d) A cannabis delivery organization agent shall notify   HB3074- 8 -LRB104 05667 BDA 15697 b1local law enforcement, the Illinois State Police, and the 2Department of Agriculture within 24 hours after the discovery 3of any loss or theft. Notification shall be made by phone, in 4person, or by written or electronic communication.5    (e) No person under the age of 21 years shall be in a 6vehicle transporting cannabis goods.7    (f) No person or individual who is not a cannabis delivery 8organization agent shall be in a vehicle while transporting 9cannabis goods.10    (g) A cannabis delivery organization agent must keep his 11or her identification card visible at all times when on the 12property of a cannabis business establishment and during the 13transportation of cannabis when acting under his or her duties 14as a cannabis delivery organization agent. During these times, 15the cannabis delivery organization agent must also provide the 16identification card upon request of any law enforcement 17officer engaged in his or her official duties.18    (h) A copy of the cannabis delivery organization's 19registration and a manifest for the delivery shall be present 20in any vehicle transporting cannabis.21    (i) Cannabis shall be transported so it is not visible or 22recognizable from outside the vehicle.23    (j) A vehicle transporting cannabis must not bear any 24markings to indicate the vehicle contains cannabis or bear the 25name or logo of the cannabis business establishment.26    (k) Cannabis must be transported in an enclosed, locked   HB3074- 9 -LRB104 05667 BDA 15697 b1storage compartment that is secured or affixed to the vehicle.2    (l) The Department may, by rule, impose any other 3requirements or prohibitions on the transportation of 4cannabis.  5    (410 ILCS 705/43-27 new)6    Sec. 43-27. Procurement of cannabis products. A cannabis 7delivery organization may obtain cannabis products from any 8cannabis business organization licensed in the State. 9    (410 ILCS 705/43-30 new)10    Sec. 43-30. Cannabis delivery agent identification card.11    (a) The Department shall:12        (1) establish, by rule, the information required in an 13    initial application or renewal application for an agent 14    identification card submitted under this Article and the 15    nonrefundable fee to accompany the initial application or 16    renewal application;17        (2) verify the information contained in an initial 18    application or renewal application for an agent 19    identification card submitted under this Article and 20    approve or deny an application within 30 days of receiving 21    a completed initial application or renewal application and 22    all supporting documentation required by rule;23        (3) issue an agent identification card to a qualifying 24    agent within 15 business days of approving the initial   HB3074- 10 -LRB104 05667 BDA 15697 b1    application or renewal application;2        (4) enter the license number of the cannabis delivery 3    organization where the agent works; and4        (5) allow for an electronic initial application and 5    renewal application process and provide a confirmation by 6    electronic or other methods that an application has been 7    submitted; the Department may, by rule, require 8    prospective agents to file their applications by 9    electronic means and provide notices to the agents by 10    electronic means. 11    (b) An agent must keep his or her identification card 12visible at all times when on the property of a cannabis 13business establishment, including the cannabis delivery 14organization for which he or she is an agent.15    (c) The agent identification cards shall contain the 16following:17        (1) the name of the cardholder;18        (2) the date of issuance and expiration date of the 19    identification card;20        (3) a random 10-digit alphanumeric identification 21    number containing at least 4 numbers and at least 4 22    letters that are unique to the holder;23        (4) a photograph of the cardholder; and24        (5) the legal name of the cannabis delivery 25    organization employing the agent. 26    (d) An agent identification card shall be immediately   HB3074- 11 -LRB104 05667 BDA 15697 b1returned to the cannabis delivery organization of the agent 2upon termination of his or her employment.3    (e) Any agent identification card lost by a cannabis 4delivery agent shall be reported to the Illinois State Police 5and the Department immediately upon discovery of the loss.6    (f) An application for an agent identification card shall 7be denied if the applicant is delinquent in filing any 8required tax returns or paying any amounts owed to the State of 9Illinois.  10    (410 ILCS 705/43-35 new)11    Sec. 43-35. Cannabis delivery organization background 12checks.13    (a) Through the Illinois State Police, the Department 14shall conduct a background check of the prospective principal 15officers, board members, and agents of a cannabis delivery 16organization applying for a license or identification card 17under this Article. The Illinois State Police shall charge a 18fee set by rule for conducting the criminal history record 19check, which shall be deposited into the State Police Services 20Fund and shall not exceed the actual cost of the record check. 21In order to carry out this provision, each cannabis delivery 22organization's prospective principal officer, board member, or 23agent shall submit a full set of fingerprints to the Illinois 24State Police for the purpose of obtaining a State and federal 25criminal records check. These fingerprints shall be checked   HB3074- 12 -LRB104 05667 BDA 15697 b1against the fingerprint records now and hereafter, to the 2extent allowed by law, filed in the Illinois State Police and 3Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history records 4databases. The Illinois State Police shall furnish, following 5positive identification, all conviction information to the 6Department.7    (b) When applying for the initial license or 8identification card, the background checks for all prospective 9principal officers, board members, and agents shall be 10completed before submitting the application to the Department.  11    (410 ILCS 705/43-40 new)12    Sec. 43-40. Renewal of cannabis delivery organization 13licenses and agent identification cards.14    (a) Licenses and identification cards issued under this 15Article shall be renewed annually. A cannabis delivery 16organization shall receive written or electronic notice 90 17days before the expiration of its current license that the 18license will expire. The Department shall grant a renewal 19within 45 days of submission of a renewal application if: 20        (1) the cannabis delivery organization submits a 21    renewal application and the required nonrefundable renewal 22    fee of $500, or after January 1, 2026, another amount set 23    by rule by the Department, to be deposited into the 24    Cannabis Regulation Fund;25        (2) the Department has not suspended or revoked the   HB3074- 13 -LRB104 05667 BDA 15697 b1    license of the cannabis delivery organization for 2    violating this Act or rules adopted under this Act;3        (3) the cannabis delivery organization has continued 4    to operate in accordance with all plans submitted as part 5    of its application and approved by the Department or any 6    amendments thereto that have been approved by the 7    Department; and8        (4) the cannabis delivery organization has submitted 9    an agent, employee, contracting, and subcontracting 10    diversity report as required by the Department. 11    (b) If a cannabis delivery organization fails to renew its 12license before expiration, it shall cease operations until its 13license is renewed.14    (c) If a cannabis delivery organization agent fails to 15renew his or her identification card before its expiration, he 16or she shall cease to work as an agent of the cannabis delivery 17organization until his or her identification card is renewed.18    (d) Any cannabis delivery organization that continues to 19operate, or any cannabis delivery organization agent who 20continues to work as an agent, after the applicable license or 21identification card has expired without renewal is subject to 22the penalties provided under Section 45-5.23    (e) The Department shall not renew a license or an agent 24identification card if the applicant is delinquent in filing 25any required tax returns or paying any amounts owed to the 26State of Illinois.